Wisconsin, session 2025, AB443.
do enact as follows:AB443,13Section 1. 814.65 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB443,2,84814.65 (1) Court costs. In a municipal court action, except for a financial 1responsibility violation under s. 344.62 (2) or for a violation of an ordinance in 2conformity with s. 343.51 (1m) (b) or 347.48 (2m), the municipal judge shall collect 3a fee of not less than $15 nor more than $38 $48 on each separate matter, whether 4it is on default of appearance, a plea of guilty or no contest, on issuance of a warrant 5or summons, or the action is tried as a contested matter. Of each fee received by the 6judge under this subsection, the municipal treasurer shall pay monthly $5 to the 7secretary of administration for deposit in the general fund and shall retain the 8balance for the use of the municipality.AB443,2,99